California, session 20252026, SB1205.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7204 is added to the Public Contract Code, to read:7204. (a) For all contracts, contracts under design-bid-build, and amendments thereto, entered into on or after January 1, 2027, directly between a public entity and a firm, any retention payments to the firm for services shall not be subject to retention. exceed 5 percent of the payment.(b) Any retention withheld pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be released no later than 60 days upon completion of the firm’s services under contract, regardless of whether the project for which the services were provided has been completed. (b)(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Firm” means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity permitted by law to practice the profession of architecture or engineering.(2) “Public entity” means the state, including every state agency, office, department, division, bureau, board, or commission, the California State University, the University of California, a city, county, city and county, including charter cities and charter counties, district, special district, public authority, political subdivision, public corporation, or nonprofit transit corporation wholly owned by a public agency and formed to carry out the purposes of the public agency.